Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1104] Delegation of authority; bond.
The administrator of the state procurement office may:

(1) Delegate to any employee any power and authority
deemed reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this part; and

(2) Bond any employee of the agency handling money,
signing checks, or receiving or distributing property from the United States or
state agencies under authority of this part. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next